District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.14

Transfers from the Office of Local Business Development to the Department of Small and Local Business Development.

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Office of Local Business Development established by § 2-1205.01 [repealed], are hereby transferred to the Department.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2314, formerly § 2315
as added Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 139, 52 DCR 10637
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(m), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 2315 to § 2314.